Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3709
Motor club; deposit securities or surety bond.

A club shall not render or agree to render a motor club service without first depositing and thereafter continuously maintaining the amount of fifty thousand dollars in cash or securities approved by the director or, in lieu of such cash or securities, a performance bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars executed by a surety company authorized by the laws of this state to transact business within this state. The bond shall be executed to the State of Nebraska and shall be for the use of the state and for any members who may have a cause of action against the club.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 9.